Louisiana, session 2026, SB457.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2225.2.4(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2225.2.4. Construction management at risk; public entity
A.(1) * * *
(3) CMAR shall not be used for any project that is estimated to cost less than
five million dollars, exclusive of a hospital service district as defined by R.S.
46:1072(2)(a) that may not use CMAR for any project estimated to cost less than two
million dollars. At least sixty days prior to proceeding to use CMAR for any project
that is estimated to cost less than fifteen million dollars, a public entity shall deliver
written notification of the proposed CMAR project by name and description of the
project, together with the reason to use CMAR, to the House and Senate
transportation, highways, and public works committees for review and approval.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1457 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 457